src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-hado_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
#Chapman 1991: 25
  N - hado: # partial paradigm
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: kodihado # "my knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: kadahado # "your knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3M: kidihado # "his knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3F: kahado # "her knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ʼakdihado # "our knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ʼavakadihado # "your knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3M: vakadihado #  "their knife"
    hado+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3F: vakadihado # "their knife"
